Florida, session 2026, HB1153.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
73
74 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 14.33, Florida
75 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 3 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
76 14.33 Medal of Heroism.—
77 (1) The Governor may award a Medal of Heroism of
78 appropriate design, with ribbons and appurtenances, to a law
79 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer,
80 juvenile detention officer, or juvenile probation officer, as
81 defined in s. 943.10(14); a firefighter, as defined in s.
82 112.191(1)(b); an emergency medical technician, as defined in s.
83 401.23; or a paramedic, as defined in s. 401.23. A recipient
84 must have distinguished himself or herself conspicuously by
85 gallantry and intrepidity, must have risked his or her life
86 deliberately above and beyond the call of duty while performing
87 duty in his or her respective position, and must have engaged in
88 hazardous or perilous activities to preserve lives with the
89 knowledge that such activities might result in great personal
90 harm.
91 Section 2. Section 112.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to
92 read:
93 112.19 Law enforcement, correctional, and correctional
94 probation officers; death benefits.—
95 (1) As used in this section, the term:
96 (a) "Employer" means a state board, commission,
97 department, division, bureau, or agency, or a county,
98 municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, which
99 employs, appoints, or otherwise engages the services of law
100 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officers.
Page 4 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
101 (b) "Fresh pursuit" means the pursuit of a person who has
102 committed or is reasonably suspected of having committed a
103 felony, misdemeanor, traffic infraction, or violation of a
104 county or municipal ordinance. The term does not imply instant
105 pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.
106 (c) "Insurance" means insurance procured from a stock
107 company or mutual company or association or exchange authorized
108 to do business as an insurer in this state.
109 (d) "Law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
110 probation officer" means any officer as defined in s. 943.10(14)
111 or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the
112 state, including any law enforcement officer, correctional
113 officer, correctional probation officer, juvenile detention
114 officer, juvenile probation officer, state attorney
115 investigator, public defender investigator, or criminal conflict
116 and civil regional counsel investigator, whose duties require
117 such officer or employee to investigate, pursue, apprehend,
118 arrest, transport, or maintain custody of persons who are
119 charged with, suspected of committing, or convicted of a crime;
120 and the term includes any member of a bomb disposal unit whose
121 primary responsibility is the location, handling, and disposal
122 of explosive devices. The term also includes any full-time
123 officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision of
124 the state, certified pursuant to chapter 943, whose duties
125 require such officer to serve process or to attend a session of
Page 5 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
126 a circuit or county court as bailiff.
127 (2)(a) The sum of $75,000 must be paid as provided in this
128 section when a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
129 probation officer, while engaged in the performance of the
130 officer's law enforcement duties, is accidentally killed or
131 receives accidental bodily injury which results in the loss of
132 the officer's life, provided that such killing is not the result
133 of suicide and that such bodily injury is not intentionally
134 self-inflicted.
135 (b) The sum of $75,000 must be paid as provided in this
136 section if a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
137 probation officer is accidentally killed as specified in
138 paragraph (a) and the accidental death occurs:
139 1. As a result of the officer's response to fresh pursuit;
140 2. As a result of the officer's response to what is
141 reasonably believed to be an emergency;
142 3. At the scene of a traffic accident to which the officer
143 has responded; or
144 4. While the officer is enforcing what is reasonably
145 believed to be a traffic law or ordinance.
146
147 This sum is in addition to any sum provided for in paragraph
148 (a).
149 (c) If a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
150 probation officer, while engaged in the performance of the
Page 6 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
151 officer's law enforcement duties, is unlawfully and
152 intentionally killed or dies as a result of such unlawful and
153 intentional act, the sum of $225,000 must be paid as provided in
154 this section.
155 (d) Such payments, pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), and
156 (c), whether secured by insurance or not, must be made to the
157 beneficiary designated by such law enforcement, correctional, or
158 correctional probation officer in writing, signed by the officer
159 and delivered to the employer during the officer's lifetime. If
160 no such designation is made, then the payments must be paid to
161 the officer's surviving child or children and to the officer's
162 surviving spouse in equal portions, and if there is no surviving
163 child or spouse, then to the officer's parent or parents. If a
164 beneficiary is not designated and there is no surviving child,
165 spouse, or parent, then the sum must be paid to the officer's
166 estate.
167 (e) Such payments, pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), and
168 (c), are in addition to any workers' compensation or retirement
169 plan benefits and are exempt from the claims and demands of
170 creditors of such law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
171 probation officer.
172 (f) If a full-time law enforcement, correctional, or
173 correctional probation officer who is certified pursuant to
174 chapter 943 and employed by a state agency is killed in the line
175 of duty while the officer is engaged in the performance of law
Page 7 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
176 enforcement duties or as a result of an assault against the
177 officer under riot conditions:
178 1. The sum of $10,000 must be paid, as provided for in
179 paragraph (d), toward the funeral and burial expenses of such
180 officer. Such benefits are in addition to any other benefits to
181 which employee beneficiaries and dependents are entitled under
182 the Workers' Compensation Law or any other state or federal
183 statutes; and
184 2. The officer's employing agency may pay up to $5,000
185 directly toward the venue expenses associated with the funeral
186 and burial services of such officer.
187 (g) Any political subdivision of the state that employs a
188 full-time law enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10(1) or
189 a full-time correctional officer as defined in s. 943.10(2) who
190 is killed in the line of duty on or after July 1, 1993, as a
191 result of an act of violence inflicted by another person while
192 the officer is engaged in the performance of law enforcement
193 duties or as a result of an assault against the officer under
194 riot conditions shall pay the entire premium of the political
195 subdivision's health insurance plan for the employee's surviving
196 spouse until remarried, and for each dependent child of the
197 employee until the child reaches the age of majority or until
198 the end of the calendar year in which the child reaches the age
199 of 25 if:
200 1. At the time of the employee's death, the child is
Page 8 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
201 dependent upon the employee for support; and
202 2. The surviving child continues to be dependent for
203 support, or the surviving child is a full-time or part-time
204 student and is dependent for support.
205 (h)1. Any employer who employs a full-time law
206 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer
207 who, on or after January 1, 1995, suffers a catastrophic injury,
208 as defined in s. 440.02, Florida Statutes 2002, in the line of
209 duty shall pay the entire premium of the employer's health
210 insurance plan for the injured employee, the injured employee's
211 spouse, and for each dependent child of the injured employee
212 until the child reaches the age of majority or until the end of
213 the calendar year in which the child reaches the age of 25 if
214 the child continues to be dependent for support, or the child is
215 a full-time or part-time student and is dependent for support.
216 The term "health insurance plan" does not include supplemental
217 benefits that are not part of the basic group health insurance
218 plan. If the injured employee subsequently dies, the employer
219 shall continue to pay the entire health insurance premium for
220 the surviving spouse until remarried, and for the dependent
221 children, under the conditions outlined in this paragraph.
222 However:
223 a. Health insurance benefits payable from any other source
224 shall reduce benefits payable under this section.
225 b. It is unlawful for a person to willfully and knowingly
Page 9 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
226 make, or cause to be made, or to assist, conspire with, or urge
227 another to make, or cause to be made, any false, fraudulent, or
228 misleading oral or written statement to obtain health insurance
229 coverage as provided under this paragraph. A person who violates
230 this sub-subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
231 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
232 c. In addition to any applicable criminal penalty, upon
233 conviction for a violation as described in sub-subparagraph b.,
234 a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation
235 officer or other beneficiary who receives or seeks to receive
236 health insurance benefits under this paragraph shall forfeit the
237 right to receive such health insurance benefits, and shall
238 reimburse the employer for all benefits paid due to the fraud or
239 other prohibited activity. For purposes of this sub-
240 subparagraph, the term "conviction" means a determination of
241 guilt that is the result of a plea or trial, regardless of
242 whether adjudication is withheld.
243 2. In order for the officer, spouse, and dependent
244 children to be eligible for such insurance coverage, the injury
245 must have occurred while the officer was in the line of duty or
246 engaged in an official training exercise. Except as otherwise
247 provided herein, this paragraph may not be construed to limit
248 health insurance coverage for which the officer, spouse, or
249 dependent children may otherwise be eligible, except that a
250 person who qualifies under this section is not eligible for the
Page 10 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
251 health insurance subsidy provided under chapter 121, chapter
252 175, or chapter 185.
253 (i) The Bureau of Crime Prevention and Training within the
254 Department of Legal Affairs shall adopt rules necessary to
255 implement paragraphs (a), (b), and (c).
256 (3) If a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
257 probation officer is accidentally killed as specified in
258 paragraph (2)(b) on or after June 22, 1990, but before July 1,
259 2019, or unlawfully and intentionally killed as specified in
260 paragraph (2)(c) on or after July 1, 1980, but before July 1,
261 2019, the state must waive certain educational expenses that the
262 child or spouse of the deceased officer incurs while obtaining a
263 career certificate, an undergraduate education, or a
264 postgraduate education. The amount waived by the state must be
265 in an amount equal to the cost of tuition and matriculation and
266 registration fees for a total of 120 credit hours. The child or
267 spouse may attend a state career center, a Florida College
268 System institution, or a state university on either a full-time
269 or part-time basis. The benefits provided to a child under this
270 subsection shall continue until the child's 25th birthday. The
271 benefits provided to a spouse under this subsection must
272 commence within 5 years after the death occurs, and entitlement
273 thereto shall continue until the 10th anniversary of that death.
274 (a) Upon failure of any child or spouse who receives a
275 waiver in accordance with this subsection to comply with the
Page 11 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
276 ordinary and minimum requirements regarding discipline and
277 scholarship of the institution attended, such benefits must be
278 withdrawn as to the child or spouse and no further moneys may be
279 expended for the child's or spouse's benefits so long as such
280 failure or delinquency continues.
281 (b) Only a student in good standing in his or her
282 respective institution may receive the benefits provided in this
283 subsection.
284 (c) A child or spouse receiving benefits under this
285 subsection must be enrolled according to the customary rules and
286 requirements of the institution attended.
287 (4)(a) The employer of such law enforcement, correctional,
288 or correctional probation officer is liable for the payment of
289 the sums specified in this section and is deemed self-insured,
290 unless it procures and maintains, or has already procured and
291 maintained, insurance to secure such payments. Any such
292 insurance may cover only the risks indicated in this section, in
293 the amounts indicated in this section, or it may cover those
294 risks and additional risks and may be in larger amounts. Any
295 such insurance must be placed by such employer only after public
296 bid of such insurance coverage which must be awarded to the
297 carrier making the lowest best bid.
298 (b) Payment of benefits to beneficiaries of state
299 employees, or of the premiums to cover the risk, under this
300 section must be paid from existing funds otherwise appropriated
Page 12 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
301 to the department employing the law enforcement, correctional,
302 or correctional probation officers.
303 (5) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and
304 procedures, and the Board of Governors shall adopt regulations
305 and procedures, as are appropriate and necessary to implement
306 the educational benefits provisions of this section.
307 (6) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
308 contrary, the death benefits provided in paragraphs (2)(c) and
309 (g) shall also be applicable and paid in cases where an officer
310 received bodily injury before July 1, 1993, and subsequently
311 died on or after July 1, 1993, as a result of such in-line-of-
312 duty injury attributable to an unlawful and intentional act, or
313 an act of violence inflicted by another, or an assault on the
314 officer under riot conditions. Payment of such benefits must be
315 in accordance with this section. This subsection may not be
316 construed to limit death benefits for which those individuals
317 listed in paragraph (2)(d) may otherwise be eligible.
318 Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and subsections
319 (2) and (3) of section 112.193, Florida Statutes, are amended to
320 read:
321 112.193 Law enforcement, correctional, and correctional
322 probation, juvenile detention, and juvenile probation officers'
323 commemorative service awards.—
324 (1) For the purposes of this section, the term:
325 (b) "Law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
Page 13 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
326 probation, juvenile detention, or juvenile probation officer"
327 means any full-time, part-time, or auxiliary officer as defined
328 in s. 943.10(14).
329 (2) Each employer that employs or appoints law
330 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation, juvenile
331 detention, or juvenile probation officers may present to each
332 such employee who retires under any provision of a state or
333 municipal retirement system, including medical disability
334 retirement, or who is eligible to retire under any such
335 provision but, instead, resigns from one employer to accept an
336 elected public office, one complete uniform including the badge
337 worn by that officer, the officer's service handgun, if one was
338 issued as part of the officer's equipment, and an identification
339 card clearly marked "RETIRED."
340 (3) Upon the death of a law enforcement, correctional, or
341 correctional probation, juvenile detention, or juvenile
342 probation officer, the employer may present to the spouse or
343 other beneficiary of the officer, upon request, one complete
344 uniform, including the badge worn by the officer. However, if a
345 law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation,
346 juvenile detention, or juvenile probation officer is killed in
347 the line of duty, the employer may present, upon request, to the
348 spouse or other beneficiary of the officer the officer's
349 service-issued handgun, if one was issued as part of the
350 officer's equipment. If the employer is not in possession of the
Page 14 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
351 service-issued handgun, the employer may, within its discretion,
352 and upon written request of the spouse or other beneficiary,
353 present a similar handgun. The provisions of this section shall
354 also apply in that instance to a law enforcement or correctional
355 officer who died before May 1, 1993. In addition, the officer's
356 service handgun may be presented by the employer for any such
357 officer who was killed in the line of duty prior to this act
358 becoming a law.
359 Section 4. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 112.194,
360 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
361 112.194 Law enforcement and correctional, juvenile
362 detention, and juvenile probation officers' Medal of Valor.—
363 (1) Any state board, commission, department, division,
364 bureau, or agency, or any county or municipality that employs or
365 appoints law enforcement officers, or correctional officers,
366 juvenile detention officers, or juvenile probation officers, as
367 defined in s. 943.10(14), may establish an award program to
368 award a Medal of Valor to any such officer whose actions are
369 extraordinary and expose the officer to peril beyond the call of
370 duty.
371 (3) Upon the death of such a law enforcement officer or
372 correctional officer, juvenile detention officer, or juvenile
373 probation officer, the employer may present the Medal of Valor
374 posthumously to the officer's closest living relative.
375 Section 5. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
Page 15 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
376 787.035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
377 787.035 Sheltering unmarried minors; aiding unmarried
378 minor runaways; violations.—
379 (1)(a) A person who is not an authorized agent of the
380 Department of Juvenile Justice or the Department of Children and
381 Families may not knowingly shelter an unmarried minor for more
382 than 24 hours without the consent of the minor's parent or
383 guardian or without notifying a law enforcement officer of the
384 minor's name and the fact that the minor is being provided
385 shelter.
386 Section 6. Subsection (14) of section 943.10, Florida
387 Statutes, is amended, and new subsections (23) and (24) are
388 added to that section, to read:
389 943.10 Definitions; ss. 943.085-943.255.—The following
390 words and phrases as used in ss. 943.085-943.255 are defined as
391 follows:
392 (14) "Officer" means any person employed or appointed as a
393 full-time, part-time, or auxiliary law enforcement officer,
394 correctional officer, or correctional probation officer,
395 juvenile detention officer, or juvenile probation officer.
396 (23) "Juvenile detention officer" means an officer who is
397 responsible for the direct supervision of youth who are held in
398 secure detention. The term includes all certified supervisor
399 personnel whose duties include, in whole or in part, the
400 supervision, training, and guidance of juvenile detention
Page 16 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
401 officers, but does not include support personnel employed by the
402 employing agency.
403 (24) "Juvenile probation officer" means an authorized
404 agent of the Department of Juvenile Justice who performs the
405 intake, case management, or supervision functions. The term
406 includes all certified supervisory personnel whose duties
407 include, in whole or in part, the supervision, training, and
408 guidance of juvenile probation officers, but does not include
409 support personnel employed by the employing agency.
410 Section 7. Subsection (15) of section 984.03, Florida
411 Statutes, is amended to read:
412 984.03 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, the term:
413 (15) "Family in need of services" means a family that has
414 a child who is running away; who is ungovernable and
415 persistently disobeying reasonable and lawful demands of the
416 parent, or legal guardian, or custodian and is beyond the
417 control of the parent, or legal guardian, or custodian; or who
418 is a habitual truant or engaging in other serious behaviors that
419 place the child at risk of future abuse, neglect, or abandonment
420 or at risk of entering the juvenile justice system. The child
421 must be referred to a law enforcement agency, the department, or
422 an agency contracted to provide services to children in need of
423 services. A family is not eligible to receive voluntary family
424 services if, at the time of the referral, the child is currently
425 under court-ordered supervision by the department for
Page 17 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
426 delinquency under chapter 985 or under court-ordered supervision
427 by the Department of Children and Families under chapter 39.
428 Section 8. Subsection (2) of section 984.09, Florida
429 Statutes, is amended to read:
430 984.09 Punishment for contempt of court; alternative
431 sanctions.—
432 (2) PLACEMENT IN A SHELTER.—A child subject to proceedings
433 under this chapter adjudicated as a child in need of services
434 may only be placed in a shelter for purposes of punishment for
435 contempt of court if alternative sanctions are unavailable or
436 inappropriate, or if the child has already been ordered to serve
437 an alternative sanction but failed to comply with the sanction.
438 Section 9. Section 985.6865, Florida Statutes, is amended
439 to read:
440 985.6865 Juvenile detention costs.—
441 (1) As used in this section, the term:
442 (a) "Detention care" means secure detention and respite
443 beds for juveniles charged with a domestic violence crime.
444 (b) "Fiscally constrained county" means a county within a
445 rural area of opportunity as designated by the Governor pursuant
446 to s. 288.0656 or each county for which the value of a mill will
447 raise no more than $5 million in revenue, based on the certified
448 school taxable value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a.,
449 from the previous July 1.
450 (c) "Total shared detention costs" means the amount of
Page 18 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
451 funds expended by the department for the costs of detention care
452 for the prior fiscal year. This amount includes the most recent
453 actual certify forward amounts minus any funds it expends on
454 detention care for juveniles residing in fiscally constrained
455 counties or out of state.
456 (2) Annually by July 15, the department shall calculate
457 and provide to each county that is not a fiscally constrained
458 county and that does not provide its own detention care for
459 juveniles its annual percentage share by dividing the total
460 number of detention days for juveniles residing in the county
461 for the most recently completed 12-month period by the total
462 number of detention days for juveniles in all counties that are
463 not fiscally constrained counties during the same period. The
464 annual percentage share of each county that is not a fiscally
465 constrained county and that does not provide its own detention
466 care for juveniles must be multiplied by 50 percent of the total
467 shared detention costs to determine that county's share of
468 detention costs. Beginning August 1, each such county shall pay
469 to the department its share of detention costs, which shall be
470 paid in 12 equal payments due on the first day of each month.
471 The state shall pay the remaining actual costs of detention
472 care.
473 (3) Each quarter, the department shall review county
474 juvenile detention payments to ensure that counties fulfill
475 their financial responsibilities required under this section. If
Page 19 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
476 the department determines that a county has not met its
477 obligations, the department must direct the Department of
478 Revenue to deduct the amount owed to the department from the
479 funds provided to the county under s. 218.23. The Department of
480 Revenue shall transfer the funds withheld into the Shared
481 County/State Juvenile Detention Trust Fund.
482 (4) As an assurance to holders of bonds issued by counties
483 before July 1 of each year, for which distributions made
484 pursuant to s. 218.23 are pledged, or bonds issued to refund
485 such bonds which mature no later than the bonds they refunded
486 and which result in a reduction of debt service payable in each
487 fiscal year, the amount available for distribution to a county
488 shall remain as provided by law and continue to be subject to
489 any lien or claim on behalf of the bondholders. The Department
490 of Revenue must ensure, based on information provided by an
491 affected county, that any reduction in amounts distributed
492 pursuant to subsection (3) does not reduce the amount of
493 distribution to a county below the amount necessary for the
494 timely payment of principal and interest when due on the bonds
495 and the amount necessary to comply with any covenant under the
496 bond resolution or other documents relating to the issuance of
497 the bonds. If a reduction to a county's monthly distribution
498 must be decreased in order to comply with this section, the
499 Department of Revenue must notify the department of the amount
500 of the decrease, and the department must send a bill for payment
Page 20 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
501 of such amount to the affected county.
502 (5)(3) The state shall pay all costs of detention care for
503 juveniles residing in a fiscally constrained county and for
504 juveniles residing out of state. The state shall pay all costs
505 of detention care for juveniles housed in state detention
506 centers from counties that provide their own detention care for
507 juveniles.
508 (6)(4) Each county that is not a fiscally constrained
509 county and that does not provide its own detention care for
510 juveniles shall incorporate into its annual county budget
511 sufficient funds to pay its annual percentage share of the total
512 shared detention costs required by subsection (2).
513 (7)(5) Funds paid by the counties to the department
514 pursuant to this section must be deposited into the Shared
515 County/State Juvenile Detention Trust Fund.
516 (6) The department shall determine each quarter whether
517 the counties are remitting funds as required by this section.
518 (8)(7) Funds received from counties pursuant to this
519 section are not subject to the service charges provided in s.
520 215.20.
521 (9)(8) The department may adopt rules to administer this
522 section.
523 Section 10. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
524 made by this act to section 112.19, Florida Statutes, in a
525 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
Page 21 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
526 112.1912, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
527 112.1912 First responders; death benefits for educational
528 expenses.—
529 (1) As used in this section, the term "first responder"
530 means:
531 (a) A law enforcement, correctional, or correctional
532 probation officer as defined in s. 112.19(1) who is killed as
533 provided in s. 112.19(2) on or after July 1, 2019;
534 Section 11. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
535 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a
536 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 384.287, Florida
537 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
538 384.287 Screening for sexually transmissible disease.—
539 (1) An officer as defined in s. 943.10(14); support
540 personnel as defined in s. 943.10(11) who are employed by the
541 Department of Law Enforcement, including, but not limited to,
542 any crime scene analyst, forensic technologist, or crime lab
543 analyst; firefighter as defined in s. 633.102; or ambulance
544 driver, paramedic, or emergency medical technician as defined in
545 s. 401.23, acting within the scope of employment, who comes into
546 contact with a person in such a way that significant exposure,
547 as defined in s. 381.004, has occurred may request that the
548 person be screened for a sexually transmissible disease that can
549 be transmitted through a significant exposure.
550 Section 12. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
Page 22 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
551 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a
552 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 493.6102, Florida
553 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
554 493.6102 Inapplicability of this chapter.—This chapter
555 shall not apply to:
556 (1) Any individual who is an "officer" as defined in s.
557 943.10(14) or is a law enforcement officer of the United States
558 Government, while such local, state, or federal officer is
559 engaged in her or his official duties or when performing off-
560 duty security activities approved by her or his superiors.
561 Section 13. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
562 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a
563 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
564 741.31, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
565 741.31 Violation of an injunction for protection against
566 domestic violence.—
567 (4)
568 (b)1. It is a violation of s. 790.233, and a misdemeanor
569 of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
570 775.083, for a person to violate a final injunction for
571 protection against domestic violence by having in his or her
572 care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or ammunition.
573 2. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
574 disabilities regarding possession of firearms and ammunition are
575 consistent with federal law. Accordingly, this paragraph shall
Page 23 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
576 not apply to a state or local officer as defined in s.
577 943.10(14), holding an active certification, who receives or
578 possesses a firearm or ammunition for use in performing official
579 duties on behalf of the officer's employing agency, unless
580 otherwise prohibited by the employing agency.
581 Section 14. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
582 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a
583 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 782.07, Florida
584 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
585 782.07 Manslaughter; aggravated manslaughter of an elderly
586 person or disabled adult; aggravated manslaughter of a child;
587 aggravated manslaughter of an officer, a firefighter, an
588 emergency medical technician, or a paramedic.—
589 (4) A person who causes the death, through culpable
590 negligence, of an officer as defined in s. 943.10(14), a
591 firefighter as defined in s. 112.191, an emergency medical
592 technician as defined in s. 401.23, or a paramedic as defined in
593 s. 401.23, while the officer, firefighter, emergency medical
594 technician, or paramedic is performing duties that are within
595 the course of his or her employment, commits aggravated
596 manslaughter of an officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical
597 technician, or a paramedic, a felony of the first degree,
598 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
599 Section 15. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
600 made by this act to section 943.10, Florida Statutes, in a
Page 24 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
601 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 790.233, Florida
602 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
603 790.233 Possession of firearm or ammunition prohibited
604 when person is subject to an injunction against committing acts
605 of domestic violence, stalking, or cyberstalking; penalties.—
606 (3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
607 disabilities regarding possession of firearms and ammunition are
608 consistent with federal law. Accordingly, this section does not
609 apply to a state or local officer as defined in s. 943.10(14),
610 holding an active certification, who receives or possesses a
611 firearm or ammunition for use in performing official duties on
612 behalf of the officer's employing agency, unless otherwise
613 prohibited by the employing agency.
614 Section 16. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
615 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in
616 references thereto, subsection (1) and paragraph (e) of
617 subsection (37) of section 39.01, Florida Statutes, are
618 reenacted to read:
619 39.01 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, unless the
620 context otherwise requires:
621 (1) "Abandoned" or "abandonment" means a situation in
622 which the parent or legal custodian of a child or, in the
623 absence of a parent or legal custodian, the caregiver, while
624 being able, has made no significant contribution to the child's
625 care and maintenance or has failed to establish or maintain a
Page 25 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
626 substantial and positive relationship with the child, or both.
627 For purposes of this subsection, "establish or maintain a
628 substantial and positive relationship" includes, but is not
629 limited to, frequent and regular contact with the child through
630 frequent and regular visitation or frequent and regular
631 communication to or with the child, and the exercise of parental
632 rights and responsibilities. Marginal efforts and incidental or
633 token visits or communications are not sufficient to establish
634 or maintain a substantial and positive relationship with a
635 child. A man's acknowledgment of paternity of the child does not
636 limit the period of time considered in determining whether the
637 child was abandoned. The term does not include a surrendered
638 infant as described in s. 383.50, a "child in need of services"
639 as defined in chapter 984, or a "family in need of services" as
640 defined in chapter 984. The absence of a parent, legal
641 custodian, or caregiver responsible for a child's welfare, who
642 is a servicemember, by reason of deployment or anticipated
643 deployment as defined in 50 U.S.C. s. 3938(e), may not be
644 considered or used as a factor in determining abandonment. The
645 incarceration, repeated incarceration, or extended incarceration
646 of a parent, legal custodian, or caregiver responsible for a
647 child's welfare may support a finding of abandonment.
648 (37) "Harm" to a child's health or welfare can occur when
649 any person:
650 (e) Abandons the child. Within the context of the
Page 26 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
651 definition of "harm," the term "abandoned the child" or
652 "abandonment of the child" means a situation in which the parent
653 or legal custodian of a child or, in the absence of a parent or
654 legal custodian, the caregiver, while being able, has made no
655 significant contribution to the child's care and maintenance or
656 has failed to establish or maintain a substantial and positive
657 relationship with the child, or both. For purposes of this
658 paragraph, "establish or maintain a substantial and positive
659 relationship" includes, but is not limited to, frequent and
660 regular contact with the child through frequent and regular
661 visitation or frequent and regular communication to or with the
662 child, and the exercise of parental rights and responsibilities.
663 Marginal efforts and incidental or token visits or
664 communications are not sufficient to establish or maintain a
665 substantial and positive relationship with a child. The term
666 "abandoned" does not include a surrendered infant as described
667 in s. 383.50, a child in need of services as defined in chapter
668 984, or a family in need of services as defined in chapter 984.
669 The incarceration, repeated incarceration, or extended
670 incarceration of a parent, legal custodian, or caregiver
671 responsible for a child's welfare may support a finding of
672 abandonment.
673 Section 17. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
674 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
675 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
Page 27 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
676 44.1011, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
677 44.1011 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
678 (2) "Mediation" means a process whereby a neutral third
679 person called a mediator acts to encourage and facilitate the
680 resolution of a dispute between two or more parties. It is an
681 informal and nonadversarial process with the objective of
682 helping the disputing parties reach a mutually acceptable and
683 voluntary agreement. In mediation, decisionmaking authority
684 rests with the parties. The role of the mediator includes, but
685 is not limited to, assisting the parties in identifying issues,
686 fostering joint problem solving, and exploring settlement
687 alternatives. "Mediation" includes:
688 (d) "Dependency or in need of services mediation," which
689 means mediation of dependency, child in need of services, or
690 family in need of services matters. Negotiations in dependency
691 or in need of services mediation are primarily conducted by the
692 parties. Counsel for each party may attend the mediation
693 conference and privately communicate with their clients.
694 However, presence of counsel is not required and, in the
695 discretion of the mediator and with the agreement of the
696 parties, mediation may proceed in the absence of counsel unless
697 otherwise ordered by the court.
698 Section 18. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
699 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
700 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
Page 28 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
701 44.102, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
702 44.102 Court-ordered mediation.—
703 (2) A court, under rules adopted by the Supreme Court:
704 (d) In circuits in which a dependency or in need of
705 services mediation program has been established, may refer to
706 mediation all or any portion of a matter relating to dependency
707 or to a child in need of services or a family in need of
708 services.
709 Section 19. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
710 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
711 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 984.04, Florida
712 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
713 984.04 Early truancy intervention; families in need of
714 services and children in need of services; procedures and
715 jurisdiction.—
716 (1) The department shall be responsible for all
717 nonjudicial proceedings involving voluntary family services for
718 a family identified as a family in need of services according to
719 rules established by the department under chapter 120.
720 Section 20. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
721 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
722 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 984.071, Florida
723 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
724 984.071 Resources and information.—
725 (1) The department shall develop and publish an
Page 29 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
726 information guide that explains the current process under this
727 chapter for obtaining assistance for a child in need of services
728 or a family in need of services and the community services and
729 resources available to parents. The information guide shall be
730 published in a written format for distribution and shall also be
731 published on the department's website. Each information guide
732 shall be reviewed annually and updated as appropriate. The
733 school district shall distribute this information guide to
734 parents of truant children, and to other parents upon request or
735 as deemed appropriate by the school district. In addition, the
736 department shall distribute the information guide to state and
737 local law enforcement agencies. Any law enforcement officer who
738 has contact with the parent of a child who is locked out of the
739 home, who is ungovernable, or who runs away from home shall make
740 the information guide available to the parent.
741 Section 21. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
742 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in
743 references thereto, subsections (1) and (2) of section 984.10,
744 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
745 984.10 Intake.—
746 (1) Intake shall be performed by the department or the
747 department's authorized agent. A report alleging that a child is
748 from a family in need of services shall be made to the intake
749 office operating in the county in which the child is found or in
750 which the case arose. Any person or agency, including, but not
Page 30 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
751 limited to, the parent, legal guardian, or custodian, the local
752 school district, a law enforcement agency, or the Department of
753 Children and Families, having knowledge of the facts may make a
754 report.
755 (2) A representative of the department shall make a
756 preliminary determination as to whether the report is complete.
757 The criteria for the completeness of a report with respect to a
758 child alleged to be from a family in need of services while
759 subject to compulsory school attendance shall be governed by s.
760 984.03. In any case in which the representative of the
761 department finds that the report is incomplete, the
762 representative of the department shall return the report without
763 delay to the person or agency originating the report or having
764 knowledge of the facts or to the appropriate law enforcement
765 agency having investigative jurisdiction and request additional
766 information in order to complete the report.
767 Section 22. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
768 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
769 reference thereto, section 984.12, Florida Statutes, is
770 reenacted to read:
771 984.12 Case staffing; services and treatment related to a
772 family in need of services.—
773 (1) The appropriate representative of the department shall
774 request a meeting of the family and child with a case staffing
775 committee to review the case of any family or child who the
Page 31 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
776 department determines is in need of services if:
777 (a) The family or child is not in agreement with the
778 services or treatment offered;
779 (b) The family or child will not participate in the
780 services or treatment selected; or
781 (c) The representative of the department needs assistance
782 in developing an appropriate plan for services. The time and
783 place selected for the meeting shall be convenient for the child
784 and family.
785 (2) The composition of the case staffing committee shall
786 be based on the needs of the family and child. It shall include
787 a representative from the child's school district and a
788 representative of the department, and may include the
789 department's authorized agent and a supervisor of the
790 department's contracted provider; a representative from the area
791 of health, mental health, substance abuse, or social services; a
792 representative of the state attorney; a representative of law
793 enforcement; and any person recommended by the child, family, or
794 department. The child and the child's parent, legal guardian, or
795 custodian must be invited to attend the committee meeting.
796 (3) The case staffing committee shall:
797 (a) Identify the family's concerns and contributing
798 factors.
799 (b) Request the family and child to identify their needs
800 and concerns.
Page 32 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
801 (c) Seek input from the school district and any other
802 persons in attendance with knowledge of the family or child's
803 situation and concerns.
804 (d) Consider the voluntary family services or other
805 community services that have been offered and the results of
806 those services.
807 (e) Identify whether truancy is a concern and evaluate
808 compliance with the remedial strategies provided pursuant to s.
809 1003.26.
810 (f) Reach a timely decision to provide the child or family
811 with services and recommend any appropriate treatment through
812 the development of a plan for services.
813 (4) The plan for services shall contain the following:
814 (a) Statement of the concerns.
815 (b) Needs of the child.
816 (c) Needs of the parents, legal guardian, or custodian.
817 (d) Measurable objectives that address the identified
818 problems and needs.
819 (e) Services and treatment to be provided, to include:
820 1. Type of services or treatment.
821 2. Frequency of services or treatment.
822 3. Location.
823 4. Accountable service providers or staff.
824 (f) Timeframes for achieving objectives.
825 (5) Upon receipt of the plan, the child and family shall
Page 33 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
826 acknowledge their position by accepting or rejecting the
827 services and provisions in writing. If the plan is accepted, it
828 shall be implemented as soon as is practicable.
829 (6) The assigned case manager shall have responsibility
830 for implementing the plan. The department's authorized agent
831 shall periodically review the progress towards achieving the
832 objectives of the plan in order to:
833 (a) Advise the case staffing committee of the need to make
834 adjustments to the plan;
835 (b) Recommend a child in need of services petition be
836 filed by the department; or
837 (c) Terminate the case as indicated by successful or
838 substantial achievement of the objectives of the plan.
839 (7) The parent, legal guardian, or custodian may convene a
840 meeting of the case staffing committee. A case staffing
841 committee meeting requested by a parent, guardian, or legal
842 custodian must be convened within 7 days, excluding weekends and
843 legal holidays, after the date the department's representative
844 receives the request in writing.
845 (8) Any other member of the committee may convene a
846 meeting if voluntary family services have been offered and the
847 services have been rejected by the child or family, or the child
848 has not made measurable progress toward achieving the service
849 plan goals, and the member finds that doing so is in the best
850 interest of the family or child.
Page 34 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
851 (9) A case staffing committee meeting must be convened
852 within 30 days after the date the case is referred by the court
853 pursuant to s. 984.151.
854 (10) Within 7 days after meeting, the case staffing
855 committee shall provide the parent, legal guardian, or custodian
856 with a written report that details the reasons for the
857 committee's decision to recommend, or decline to recommend, that
858 the department file a petition alleging that the child is a
859 child in need of services.
860 (11) The case staffing committee may reconvene from time
861 to time as may be necessary to make adjustments to the plan.
862 Section 23. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
863 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
864 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 984.13, Florida
865 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
866 984.13 Taking a child into custody.—
867 (3) If the child is taken into custody and is delivered to
868 a shelter, the department's authorized agent shall review the
869 facts and make such further inquiry as necessary to determine
870 whether the child shall remain in shelter, receive voluntary
871 family services that would allow the child alleged to be from a
872 family in need of services to remain at home, or be released.
873 Section 24. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
874 made by this act to section 984.03, Florida Statutes, in a
875 reference thereto, subsection (23) of section 985.03, Florida
Page 35 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
876 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
877 985.03 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
878 (23) "Family in need of services" has the same meaning as
879 provided in s. 984.03.
880 Section 25. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
881 made by this act to section 984.09, Florida Statutes, in a
882 reference thereto, subsection (33) of section 984.03, Florida
883 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
884 984.03 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, the term:
885 (33) "Shelter" means a department-approved shelter
886 facility for the temporary care of runaway children; for
887 children placed for voluntary shelter respite upon request of
888 the child or the child's parent, legal guardian, or custodian;
889 or for placement of a child who has been adjudicated a child in
890 need of services or who has been found in contempt of court
891 under s. 984.09. Shelters must provide 24-hour continual
892 supervision. A shelter must be licensed by the Department of
893 Children and Families as a licensed child-caring agency.
894 Section 26. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
895 made by this act to section 984.09, Florida Statutes, in a
896 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 984.07, Florida
897 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
898 984.07 Right to counsel; waiver; appointed counsel;
899 compensation.—
900 (1) When a petition is filed alleging that a child is a
Page 36 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1153 2026 Legislature
901 child in need of services or if the child is subject to contempt
902 proceedings under s. 984.09, the child must be represented by
903 counsel at each court appearance. The court must appoint counsel
904 unless the child is not indigent and has counsel present to
905 represent the child or the record in that proceeding
906 affirmatively demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that
907 the child knowingly and intelligently waived the right to
908 counsel after being fully advised by the court of the nature of
909 the proceedings and the dispositional alternatives available to
910 the court. If the child waives counsel at any proceeding, the
911 court shall advise the child with respect to the right to
912 counsel at every subsequent hearing.
913 Section 27. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
914 made by this act to section 984.09, Florida Statutes, in a
915 reference thereto, subsection (12) of section 984.151, Florida
916 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
917 984.151 Early truancy intervention; truancy petition;
918 judgment.—
919 (12) The court may not order a child placed in shelter
920 pursuant to this section unless the court has found the child to
921 be in contempt for violation of a court order under s. 984.09.
922 Section 28. This act shall take effect upon becoming a
923 law.
Page 37 of 37
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1153 -02-er